Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202520-132
Full and equal enjoyment of accommodations.

All persons within this state shall be entitled to a full and equal enjoyment of any place of public accommodation, as defined in sections 20-132 to 20-143, without discrimination or segregation on the grounds of race, color, sex, religion, national origin, disability, ancestry, or military or veteran status.

Laws 1969, c. 120, § 18, p. 550;

R.R.S.1943, § 20-122;

Laws 1973, LB 112, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB540, § 12;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 9.